Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 91
INSTITUTIONS - GENERAL ADMINISTRATIVE PROVISIONS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of article 2 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

27-91-101. Legislative declaration.

The purpose of this section and section 27-91-102 is to provide for the payment of actual expenses only, in lieu of stated salaries and mileage, to all members of boards of control of state institutions.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 768, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-101 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-102. Boards of control entitled only to actual expenses.

A member of a board of control, trustees, or commissioners of all institutions supported by or under the patronage and control of the state shall receive as compensation for his or her services only actual expenses incurred in attendance upon and in going to and returning from each regular and special meeting of the board of control, trustees, or commissioners or for performing any services whatever for the institution of which he or she is a member of the board of control, trustees, or commissioners, payment to be made out of the funds appropriated for the support and maintenance of the respective institutions. In all cases of cash paid out by the member of a board of control, trustees, or commissioners, an itemized account, accompanied by the proper vouchers therefor, signed by the party to whom such money has been paid, shall accompany the vouchers upon which all warrants for such expenditures shall issue.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 768, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-102 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-103. Debts in excess of appropriation - emergencies.

The various officers designated by law to control and direct the fiscal affairs of the several state institutions shall not contract within any year any indebtedness in excess of the amount named in any appropriation made for the support of any state institution during that time; but, in cases of emergency, the governor may authorize the contraction of such indebtedness that in his or her judgment is absolutely necessary for the maintenance and support of the institution, until such time as the general assembly meets. The officers of any state institution, supported by the levy of any special tax, shall contract no indebtedness in any year in excess of eighty percent of the gross amount of the levy made for that year from which to support that institution.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 768, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-103 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-104. The term "officer" includes members of boards.

The term "officer" as used in section 27-91-105 includes any member of the various boards created by law to govern or supervise the respective state institutions.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 768, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-104 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-105. Indebtedness limited to appropriation.

It is unlawful for any officer of any state institution of this state to incur or contract any indebtedness for, on behalf of, or in the name of the state institution or in the name of the state in excess of the sum appropriated by the general assembly for the use or support of the institution for the fiscal year. An officer of any state institution shall not draw any money from the state treasury unless the same is absolutely needed and required by the institution at the time, and then only upon the warrant of the controller.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 768, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-105 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-106. Violation - penalty.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of section 27-91-105 is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than three hundred dollars.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 769, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-106 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-107. Purchase of supplies by and from institutions.

The following designated state institutions are within the purview of this section: All facilities of the departments of corrections and human services, the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, the Wheat Ridge regional center, the Grand Junction regional center, the Pueblo regional center, the Lookout Mountain school at Golden, the Mount View school at Morrison, the Colorado industries for the blind, and the Colorado psychiatric hospital.

When any of the institutions enumerated in subsection (1) of this section are in need of supplies that are grown, produced, or manufactured by any other of the institutions, it shall purchase the same from the other institution if it has a surplus thereof of suitable quality available for sale at a price not in excess of the current market price for such supplies, and it is the duty of the managing boards of such respective institutions to require observance of the provisions of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 769, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-107 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-108. Display of flags.

The chief administrative officer of any state institution supported in whole or in part by the state and under the control of the state shall have erected and maintained, at the entrance of the institution or on the principal administrative building or grounds thereof, a suitable flagstaff with the attachments necessary for the display of flags and shall cause to be displayed thereon the flags of the United States and of the state of Colorado. The flag of the state of Colorado shall be the same size as the flag of the United States with which it is displayed. If both flags are displayed on one flagstaff, the flag of the state of Colorado shall be placed below the flag of the United States.

The chief administrative officer of any court facility supported in whole or in part by the state and under the control of the state shall cause to be permanently and prominently displayed the flag of the United States, as described in chapter 1 of title 4, U.S.C., in each courtroom when a court proceeding is in session. A flag displayed in a courtroom must measure three by five feet. No alleged failure to cause the flag of the United States to be permanently and prominently displayed in a courtroom supported in whole or in part by the state and under the control of the state shall be the basis of any challenge to such court's authority or jurisdiction or for any appeal of any decision, order, or judgment of such court.

The flags of the United States and of the state of Colorado shall be permanently and prominently displayed in all committee rooms under the control of the general assembly of the state of Colorado.

On and after September 1, 1996, the chief administrative officer of any school supported in whole or in part by the state and under the control of the state shall cause to be displayed permanently and prominently the flag of the United States, as described in chapter 1 of title 4, U.S.C., in each academic classroom when an academic class is in session. A flag displayed in an academic classroom shall measure no less than either twelve by eighteen inches if it is displayed in a frame or two by three feet if it is displayed on a flagstaff.

The chief administrative officer of any school or court facility supported in whole or in part by the state and under the control of the state is hereby authorized to accept donations of flags to be displayed in classrooms or courtrooms pursuant to the provisions of subsection (2) of this section.

The chief administrative officer of any state institution, school, or court facility described in this section shall not permit the display of any depiction or representation of a flag of the United States that is intended for public view and permanently affixed or attached to any part of the building or grounds of said state institution, school, or court facility, and which display does not conform with 4 U.S.C. sec. 7.

Nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to preclude the temporary display of any instructional or historical materials or student work product included as part of a lesson not permanently affixed or attached to any part of said building or grounds.

Any flag of the United States displayed pursuant to this section shall be displayed as described in 4 U.S.C. sec. 7.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 769, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-108 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-91-109. Personal display of flags.

The right to display reasonably the flag of the United States shall not be infringed with respect to the display:

On an individual's person;

Anywhere on an individual's personal or real property; and

In the buildings or on the grounds of any tax-supported property in the state; except that the state or political subdivision that has jurisdiction over the building or grounds may adopt reasonable rules and regulations regarding the size, number, placement, manner of display, and lighting of the flag, and the location, size, and height of flagpoles.

Notwithstanding any provision of subsection (1) of this section to the contrary, the right with respect to an individual's real property shall be subject to reasonable restrictive covenants or equitable servitudes; except that no such covenant or servitude, nor any owners' association shall prohibit the outdoor display of the flag of the United States by a property owner on that owner's property if the flag is displayed in a manner consistent with chapter 1 of title 4 of the United States Code, as amended.

Notwithstanding any provision of paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to the contrary, an owners' association, the state, or a political subdivision may adopt reasonable rules and regulations regarding the size, number, placement, manner of display, and lighting of the flag, and the location, size, and height of flagpoles.

For purposes of this section, "display reasonably" shall be presumed to include a display of the flag of the United States that is consistent with chapter 1 of title 4 of the United States Code, as amended.

A right described in subsection (1) of this section is a civil right of free speech and a protected form of expression under the first amendment to the United States constitution and section 10 of article II of the state constitution.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 770, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-2-108.5 as it existed prior to 2010.